Wyoming, session 2025, HB0159.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:
HB0159

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0354

Section 1. W.S. 35-6-201 through 35-6-204 are created
to read:

ARTICLE 2
REGULATION OF CHEMICAL ABORTIONS

35-6-201. Definitions.

(a) As used in this article:

(i) "Abortion" means the act of using or
prescribing any instrument, medicine, drug or any other
substance, device or means with the intent to terminate the
pregnancy of a woman, including the elimination of one (1)
or more unborn babies, with knowledge that the termination
by those means will, with reasonable likelihood, cause the
death of the unborn baby. "Abortion" shall not include any
use, prescription or means specified in this paragraph if
the use, prescription or means are done with the intent to:

(A) Save the life or preserve the health of
the unborn baby;
HB0159

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0354

(B) Remove a dead unborn baby caused by
spontaneous abortion or intrauterine fetal demise;

(C) Treat a woman for an ectopic pregnancy;
or

(D) Treat a woman for cancer or another
disease that requires medical treatment which treatment may
be fatal or harmful to the unborn baby.

(ii) "Abortion drug" means any medicine, drug or
other substance, or combination thereof and excluding
medicines, drugs and substances used for contraceptive
purposes, when used to intentionally:

(A) Kill the unborn baby of a woman known
to be pregnant; or

(B) Terminate the pregnancy of a woman
known to be pregnant with an intention other than to
produce a live birth or to remove a dead unborn baby.

HB0159

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0354
(iii) "Catch kit" means a collection container
designed to catch and hold medical waste or infectious
waste, including containers used for collecting samples for
testing;

(iv) "Chemical abortion" means the use of an
abortion drug to intentionally:

(A) Kill the unborn baby of a woman known
to be pregnant; or

(B) Terminate the pregnancy of a woman
known to be pregnant, with an intention other than to
produce a live birth or to remove a dead unborn baby.

(v) "Health care provider" means any person
licensed to prescribe prescription drugs under federal law
or state law;

(vi) "Medical waste bag" means a biohazardous
waste container made to contain medical or biohazardous
waste;

HB0159

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0354
(vii) "Pregnancy" or "pregnant" means the human
female reproductive condition of having a living unborn
baby or human being within a human female's body throughout
the entire embryonic and fetal stages of the unborn human
being from fertilization, when a fertilized egg has
implanted in the wall of the uterus, to full gestation and
childbirth;

(viii) "Unborn baby" means an individual living
member of the species homo sapiens throughout the entire
embryonic and fetal stages from fertilization to full
gestation and childbirth.

35-6-202. Chemical abortions; requirements;
penalties; liability; exceptions.

(a) No health care provider shall knowingly provide
or attempt to provide a chemical abortion without
completing all of the following:

(i) Physically examining the patient;

HB0159

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0354
(ii) Being physically present with the patient
at a hospital or the health care provider's facility when
the woman ingests the first abortion drug or drugs
necessary for a chemical abortion;

(iii) Scheduling a follow-up visit for the
patient that occurs not later than seven (7) days after the
administration or use of the abortion drug in order to
assess the patient's condition;

(iv) Providing a catch kit and medical waste bag
to the patient, including instructions for the patient on
how to use the catch kit and to bring the catch kit and
medical waste bag to the health care provider for proper
disposal.

(b) Any health care provider who violates subsection
(a) of this section shall be guilty of a felony punishable
by imprisonment for not to exceed three (3) years, a fine
not to exceed ten thousand dollars ($10,000.00), or both.

(c) Subsections (a) and (b) of this section shall not
apply to:
HB0159

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0354

(i) A pregnant woman who procures or attempts to
procure a chemical abortion;

(ii) Efforts by a health care provider to treat
a diagnosed ectopic pregnancy.

(d) Medical waste bags provided to pregnant women
seeking a chemical abortion under this article shall:

(i) Contain warning labels that state
"BIOHAZARD" and the universal biological hazard symbol;

(ii) Be fluorescent orange or orange-red with
lettering and symbols in a contrasting color.

35-6-203. Applicability; conflict of laws.

If any provision of this article conflicts with the Life is
a Human Right Act or W.S. 35-6-139, the provisions of the
Life is a Human Right Act and W.S. 35-6-139 shall control
over this article to the extent that the Life is a Human
Right Act and W.S. 35-6-139 are enforceable.
HB0159

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0354

35-6-204. Prohibited acts; abortion drugs in
wastewater.

(a) No abortion drug shall enter wastewater or any
public water supply, community water system or the waters
of the state. The manufacturer or manufacturers of any
abortion drug shall be responsible for ensuring proper
disposal of discarded abortion drugs and for mitigating and
remediating any environmental effects of abortion drugs,
including endocrine-disrupting chemical byproducts of
abortion drugs, that may enter any disposal system,
sewerage system, public water supply, community water
system or the waters of the state as a result of the
disposal of tainted human remains from at-home abortions.

(b) If endocrine-disrupting chemicals from abortion
drugs are found in wastewater, a public water supply, a
community water system or the waters of the state, the
manufacturer or manufacturers of the abortion drugs shall
be strictly, absolutely, jointly and severally liable for
the cleanup, remediation and any further preventative
measures that the department of environmental quality may
HB0159

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0354
require. If a plaintiff who brings suit under this section
is unable to identify the specific manufacturer of the
abortion drug found in the wastewater, public water supply,
community water system or waters of the state, then
liability shall be apportioned among all manufacturers of
abortion drugs in proportion to each manufacturer's share
of the national production for abortion drugs at the time
of the discovery.

(c) Notwithstanding any other provision of law:

(i) A person may bring an action under this
section against a manufacturer or manufacturers of abortion
drugs not later than six (6) years after the discovery of
the abortion drug in the wastewater, public water supply,
community water system or waters of the state;

(ii) The following shall not be a defense to an
action brought under this subsection:

(A) Ignorance or mistake of the law;

HB0159

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0354
(B) A defendant's belief that the
requirements or provisions of this article are or were
unconstitutional;

(C) A defendant's reliance on:

(I) Any court decision that has been
vacated, reversed or overruled on appeal or by a subsequent
court, even if that court decision had not been vacated,
reversed or overruled when the cause of action accrued;

(II) Any state or federal court
decision that is not binding on the court in which the
action is brought;

(III) Any federal statute, agency rule
or action or treaty that has been repealed, superseded or
declared invalid or unconstitutional, even if that federal
statute, agency rule or action or treaty had not been
repealed, superseded or declared invalid or
unconstitutional when the cause of action accrued.

HB0159

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0354
(D) Nonmutual issue preclusion or nonmutual
claim preclusion;

(E) The consent of the plaintiff or the
unborn baby's mother to the abortion, or the consent of one
(1) or both of the parents of the unborn baby's mother to
the abortion or the consent of the legal guardian of the
unborn baby's mother to the abortion;

(F) Contributory or comparative negligence;

(G) Assumption of risk;

(H) A lack of but-for proximate causation;

(J) Any claim that the enforcement of this
article or the imposition of civil liability against the
defendant will violate the constitutional rights of third
parties, except as provided by subsection (d) of this
section.

(iii) The courts of this state shall have and
may exercise personal jurisdiction over any defendant sued
HB0159

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0354
under this subsection to the maximum extent permitted by
the Wyoming and United States constitutions;

(iv) The law of the state of Wyoming shall apply
to any action brought under this subsection to the maximum
extent permitted by the United States constitution;

(v) Any contractual choice-of-law provision that
requires or purports to require the application of the laws
of a different jurisdiction shall be void as against public
policy and shall not be enforceable in any court.

(d) A defendant against whom an action is brought
under subsection (c) of this section may assert an
affirmative defense to liability if the defendant
demonstrates one (1) or more of the following by a
preponderance of the evidence:

(i) The imposition of civil liability on the
defendant will violate constitutional or federally
protected rights that belong to the defendant personally;

HB0159

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0354
(ii) The defendant has standing to assert the
rights of a third party under the tests for third-party
standing established by the United States supreme court and
demonstrates that the imposition of civil liability on the
defendant will violate constitutional or federally
protected rights belonging to that third party;

(iii) The imposition of civil liability on the
defendant will violate the Wyoming constitution, as
interpreted by the Wyoming supreme court;

(iv) The imposition of civil liability on the
defendant would violate the limits on extraterritorial
jurisdiction imposed by the United States constitution or
the Wyoming constitution.

(e) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the
following shall apply to any action, claim, counterclaim or
any other type of legal or equitable action brought under
this section:

(i) The state and each of its officers and
employees shall have sovereign immunity;
HB0159

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0354

(ii) The political subdivisions of the state and
their officers and employees shall have governmental
immunity;

(iii) Each officer and employee of the state and
its political subdivisions shall have official immunity,
governmental immunity and sovereign immunity, as
appropriate;

(iv) The immunity conferred under this
subsection shall apply to:

(A) Any action, claim or counterclaim
brought under this section;

(B) Any type of legal or equitable action
that challenges the validity of any provision or
application of this section;

(C) Any rule issued under this article,
W.S. 35-11-302 or 35-6-133;

HB0159

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0354
(D) Any constitutional challenge brought
challenging the validity of this article;

(E) Any action that seeks to prevent or
enjoin the state, its political subdivisions or any
officer, employee or agent of the state or a political
subdivision from enforcing any provision or application of
this article, any rule issued under this article, W.S.
35-11-302 or 35-6-133 or from hearing, adjudicating or
docketing a civil action brought under this section, unless
the immunity has been abrogated or preempted by federal law
in a manner consistent with the United States constitution.

(v) The sovereign immunity conferred under this
subsection shall include the constitutional sovereign
immunity recognized by the United States supreme court in
Seminole Tribe v. Florida, 517 U.S. 44 (1996) and Alden v.
Maine, 527 U.S. 706 (1999), which applies in both state and
federal court and which may not be abrogated by Congress or
by any state or federal court except pursuant to
congressional legislation authorized by section 5 of the
Fourteenth Amendment to the United States constitution, by
the bankruptcy clause of article I of the United States
HB0159

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0354
constitution or by Congress's powers to raise and support
armies and to provide and maintain a navy or by any other
ground that might be recognized by the United States
supreme court.

(f) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the
immunity conferred under subsection (e) of this section
shall apply in every court, both state and federal, and in
every adjudicative proceeding of any type whatsoever.

(g) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, no
provision of state law shall be construed to waive or
abrogate any immunity provided under subsection (e) of this
section unless the state law expressly waives or abrogates
the immunity provided in subsection (e) of this section.

(h) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, no
attorney representing the state or its political
subdivisions or an officer, employee or agent thereof shall
waive an immunity described in subsection (e) of this
section or take any action that would result in an express
or implied waiver of that immunity. Any action taken in
HB0159

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0354
violation of this subsection shall be regarded as a legal
nullity and an ultra vires act.

(j) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, no
court of this state shall award declaratory or injunctive
relief or any type of state or writ, including a writ of
prohibition, that would pronounce any provision or
application of this article invalid or unconstitutional or
that would restrain the state and its political
subdivisions or any officer, employee or agent thereof from
enforcing any provision or application of this article, any
rule promulgated under W.S. 35-11-302 or 35-6-133 or from
hearing, adjudicating, docketing or filing a civil action
brought under this section. No court of this state shall
have jurisdiction to consider any action, claim or
counterclaim that seeks a form of relief specified in this
subsection unless required by the Wyoming constitution and
no action, claim or counterclaim brought for a form of
relief specified in this subsection shall be litigated on
behalf of a plaintiff or defendant class, notwithstanding
rule 23 of the Wyoming rules of civil procedure. No court
shall certify a plaintiff or defendant class in any action
seeking the relief specified in this subsection.
HB0159

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0354

(k) Nothing in this article shall be construed to
prevent a litigant from asserting the invalidity or
unconstitutionality of any provision or application of this
article as a defense to any action, claim or counterclaim
brought against that litigant.

(m) Recognizing Leavitt v. Jane L., 518 U.S. 137
(1996), where the United States supreme court held that, in
the context of determining the severability of a state
statute regulating abortion, an explicit statement of
legislative intent is controlling, it is the intent of the
legislature that every provision, section, subsection,
sentence, clause, phrase or word in this article, and every
application of the provisions of this article to every
person, group of persons or circumstances, are severable
from each other. The following shall apply to this article:

(i) If any application of any provision in this
article to any person, group of persons or circumstances is
found by a court to be invalid, preempted or
unconstitutional for any reason whatsoever, then the
remaining applications of that provision to all other
HB0159

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0354
persons and circumstances shall be severed and preserved
and shall remain in effect. All constitutionally valid
applications of the provisions in this article shall be
severed from any applications that a court finds to be
invalid, preempted or unconstitutional because it is the
legislature's intent and priority that every single valid
application of every statutory provision be allowed to
stand alone;

(ii) The legislature further declares that it
would have enacted this article and each provision,
section, subsection, sentence, clause, phrase or word, and
all constitutional applications of the provisions of this
article, irrespective of the fact that any provision,
section, subsection, sentence, clause, phrase or word, or
applications of this article, were declared to be invalid,
preempted or unconstitutional;

(iii) If any provision of this article is found
by any court to be unconstitutionally vague, then the
applications of that provision that do not present
unconstitutional vagueness problems shall be severed and
HB0159

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0354
remain in force, consistent with the severability
requirements of this subsection;

(iv) No court shall decline to enforce the
severability requirements of this subsection on the ground
that severing would rewrite the statute or involve the
court in legislative or lawmaking activity. A court that
declines to enforce or that enjoins a state official from
enforcing a statutory provision is never rewriting a
statute or engaging in legislative or lawmaking activity,
as the statute continues to contain the same words as
before the court's decision. A judicial injunction or
declaration of unconstitutionality:

(A) Is nothing more than an edict
prohibiting enforcement of the disputed statute against the
named parties to that lawsuit, which may subsequently be
vacated by a later court if that court has a different
understanding of the requirements of the Wyoming
constitution or the United States constitution;

(B) Is not a formal amendment of the
language in a statute; and
HB0159

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0354

(C) No more rewrites a statute than a
decision by the executive branch not to enforce a duly
enacted statute in a limited and defined set of
circumstances.

(v) If any state or federal court disregards any
of the severability requirements of this subsection and
declares or finds any provision of this article facially
invalid, preempted or unconstitutional when there are
discrete applications of that provision that can be
enforced against a person, group of persons or
circumstances without violating federal law, the United
States constitution or the Wyoming constitution, then that
provision shall be interpreted, as a matter of state law,
as if the legislature had enacted a provision limited to
the persons, group of persons or circumstances for which
the provision's application will not violate federal law,
the United States constitution or the Wyoming constitution.
Every court and every state official shall adopt this
saving construction of that provision until the court
ruling that pronounced the provision facially invalid,
HB0159

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0354
preempted or unconstitutional is vacated, overruled or
abrogated.

Section 2. W.S. 35-6-133 and 35-11-302(a) by creating
a new paragraph (xii) are amended to read:

35-6-133. Rules and regulations for disposal of
bodies and parts thereof.

The state department of health may shall prescribe rules
and regulations for the disposal of the bodies, tissues,
organs and parts thereof of an unborn child, human fetus or
human embryo which has been aborted.

35-11-302. Administrator's authority to recommend
standards, rules, regulations or permits.

(a) The administrator, after receiving public comment
and after consultation with the advisory board, shall
recommend to the director rules, regulations, standards and
permit systems to promote the purposes of this act. Such
rules, regulations, standards and permit systems shall
prescribe:
HB0159

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0354

(xii) Standards for the collection and disposal
of discarded abortion drugs as defined by W.S.
35-6-201(a)(ii) and for the mitigation and remediation
necessary to address the environmental effects of abortion
drugs that are discharged into any disposal system,
sewerage system, public water supply, community water
system or the waters of the state. Rules promulgated under
this paragraph shall include requirements for the testing
of community water systems and public water supplies to
ensure that endocrine-disrupting chemical byproducts of
abortion drugs do not enter a water system or water supply.

Section 3.

(a) The department of health shall promulgate all
rules within its authority necessary to implement this act.

(b) The environmental quality council, upon
recommendation from the department of environmental
quality, shall promulgate all rules within its authority
necessary to implement this act.

HB0159

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0354
Section 4. This act is effective immediately upon
completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law
as provided by Article 4, Section 8 of the Wyoming
Constitution.

(END)
HB0159